Florida, session 2026, HB57.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The Agreement Among the States to Elect the
President by National Popular Vote.—The Agreement Among the
States to Elect the President by National Popular Vote is hereby
enacted into law and entered into by this state with all states
legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb57-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 57 2026
Article I
Membership.—Any State of the United States and the District
of Columbia may become a member of this agreement by enacting
this agreement.

Article II
Right of the people in member states to vote for President
and Vice President.—Each member state shall conduct a statewide
popular election for President and Vice President of the United
States.

Article III
Manner of appointing presidential electors in member
states.—Prior to the time set by law for the meeting and voting
by the presidential electors, the chief election official of
each member state shall determine the number of votes for each
presidential slate in each State of the United States and in the
District of Columbia in which votes have been cast in a
statewide popular election and shall add such votes together to
produce a "national popular vote total" for each presidential
slate.
The chief election official of each member state shall
designate the presidential slate with the largest national
popular vote total as the "national popular vote winner."
The presidential elector certifying official of each member
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb57-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 57 2026
state shall certify the appointment in that official's own state
of the elector slate nominated in that state in association with
the national popular vote winner.
At least six days before the day fixed by law for the
meeting and voting by the presidential electors, each member
state shall make a final determination of the number of popular
votes cast in the state for each presidential slate and shall
communicate an official statement of such determination within
24 hours to the chief election official of each other member
state.
The chief election official of each member state shall
treat as conclusive an official statement containing the number
of popular votes in a state for each presidential slate made by
the day established by federal law for making a state's final
determination conclusive as to the counting of electoral votes
by Congress.
In event of a tie for the national popular vote winner, the
presidential elector certifying official of each member state
shall certify the appointment of the elector slate nominated in
association with the presidential slate receiving the largest
number of popular votes within that official's own state.
If, for any reason, the number of presidential electors
nominated in a member state in association with the national
popular vote winner is less than or greater than that state's
number of electoral votes, the presidential candidate on the
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb57-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 57 2026
presidential slate that has been designated as the national
popular vote winner shall have the power to nominate the
presidential electors for that state and that state's
presidential elector certifying official shall certify the
appointment of such nominees.
The chief election official of each member state shall
immediately release to the public all vote counts or statements
of votes as they are determined or obtained.
This article shall govern the appointment of presidential
electors in each member state in any year in which this
agreement is, on July 20, in effect in states cumulatively
possessing a majority of the electoral votes.

Article IV
Other provisions.—This agreement shall take effect when
states cumulatively possessing a majority of the electoral votes
have enacted this agreement in substantially the same form and
the enactments by such states have taken effect in each state.
Any member state may withdraw from this agreement, except
that a withdrawal occurring six months or less before the end of
a President's term shall not become effective until a President
or Vice President shall have been qualified to serve the next
term.
The chief executive of each member state shall promptly
100 notify the chief executive of all other states of when this
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb57-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 57 2026
101 agreement has been enacted and has taken effect in that
102 official's state, when the state has withdrawn from this
103 agreement, and when this agreement takes effect generally.
104 This agreement shall terminate if the electoral college is
105 abolished.
106 If any provision of this agreement is held invalid, the
107 remaining provisions shall not be affected.
108
109 Article V
110 Definitions.—For purposes of this agreement,
111 "Chief election official" shall mean the state official or
112 body that is authorized to certify the total number of popular
113 votes for each presidential slate;
114 "Chief executive" shall mean the Governor of a State of the
115 United States or the Mayor of the District of Columbia;
116 "Elector slate" shall mean a slate of candidates who have
117 been nominated in a state for the position of presidential
118 elector in association with a presidential slate;
119 "Presidential elector" shall mean an elector for President
120 and Vice President of the United States;
121 "Presidential elector certifying official" shall mean the
122 state official or body that is authorized to certify the
123 appointment of the state's presidential electors;
124 "Presidential slate" shall mean a slate of two persons, the
125 first of whom has been nominated as a candidate for President of
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb57-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 57 2026
126 the United States and the second of whom has been nominated as a
127 candidate for Vice President of the United States, or any legal
128 successors to such persons, regardless of whether both names
129 appear on the ballot presented to the voter in a particular
130 state;
131 "State" shall mean a State of the United States and the
132 District of Columbia; and
133 "Statewide popular election" shall mean a general election
134 in which votes are cast for presidential slates by individual
135 voters and counted on a statewide basis.
136 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb57-00